Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2
MOTOR VEHICLE EMISSION INSPECTION AND MAINTENANCE

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Low emission vehicle certification, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-25.

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 enactment of this article, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 186 (1992).

12-9-40. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Motor Vehicle Emission Inspection and Maintenance Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-9-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2.)

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Administrative Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 81 (2001).

12-9-41. Legislative findings.

With respect to the ambient air quality in this state, the General Assembly finds that:

Some counties of the state have ambient air levels of ozone or carbon monoxide in excess of the National Ambient Air Quality Standards (NAAQS) for such pollutants specified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (USEPA) pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 7401, et seq., as amended; and that the USEPA has determined that under certain conditions, such excess levels in such counties are directly related to emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide from responsible motor vehicles registered in such counties;

In order to comply with federal health related air standards in counties where the USEPA has determined that excess levels of ozone or carbon monoxide or both are directly related to emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide from responsible motor vehicles, it is necessary to monitor and limit emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide from responsible motor vehicles registered in such counties;

The USEPA has the duty, by law, to designate those areas of the state violating the NAAQS and has and will, from time to time, as facts dictate, designate those counties or areas of the state violating the NAAQS for ozone and carbon monoxide, and the USEPA has the duty, by law, to establish criteria to determine whether the excess levels of ozone or carbon monoxide or both are directly related to emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide from responsible motor vehicles in such counties;

With respect to such designations, when counties or areas are designated to have ambient air levels of pollutants in excess of the NAAQS and according to the criteria established by the USEPA the excess levels of pollution are directly related to emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide from responsible motor vehicles, the state is under a duty to provide a plan for reducing the ambient air levels of pollutants found to be in excess of the NAAQS if the state is to maintain its authority to permit new or expanded industry in such county or area; and

Failure of the state to provide a legally enforceable mechanism pursuant to state law for reducing such pollutants in such counties or areas to levels within the NAAQS will result in such a mechanism subsequently being devised by USEPA and enforced in such areas pursuant to federal law and could result in a significant loss of federal funds for sewage treatment plants, transportation projects, and air quality improvement funds; further, new or expanded industry which would contribute to the ambient air level of such pollutants would be subject to significant new emission control requirements to offset increased emissions.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 1.)

12-9-42. Declaration of public policy.

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of Georgia as expressed in this article to preserve, protect, and improve air quality in those counties or areas of the state where the ambient air levels of ozone or carbon monoxide or both are in excess of the NAAQS, as designated by the USEPA and such levels, according to the criteria established by the USEPA, are directly related to the emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide from responsible motor vehicles registered in such counties or areas of the state; and to that end to provide a legally enforceable mechanism for the attainment and maintenance of the NAAQS of such pollutants in such counties or areas of the state by requiring that emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide from responsible motor vehicles registered in such counties or areas of the state; shall be subject to inspection of exhaust emissions, evaporative emissions, inspection and maintenance of emission control equipment, and inspection and maintenance of on-board diagnostics to ensure compliance with such emission standards.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2.)

12-9-43. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Certificate of authorization" means a certificate issued by the Department of Natural Resources to each establishment or location designated as an official emission inspection station.

"Certificate of emission inspection" means an official certificate that exhaust emissions, evaporative emissions, emission control equipment, and on-board diagnostic equipment have been inspected and approved in accordance with this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article. Such certificates will be furnished to official emission inspection stations by the department to be completed and issued by such stations to the owner or operator of a responsible motor vehicle upon inspection and approval certifying that such responsible motor vehicle has been inspected and complies with the inspection and maintenance required by this article.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of natural resources.

"Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Emission inspection station" means a motor vehicle dealership, garage, service station, or other establishment designated or operated by the department and which has been issued by the director a certificate of authorization as an emission inspection station authorized to carry out the emission inspections required by this article.

"Emission inspection sticker" means a sticker issued in conjunction with a certificate of emission inspection to be displayed on the responsible motor vehicle.

"Exhaust emission" means:

The act of releasing hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, or carbon monoxide into the atmosphere by means of a motor vehicle exhaust system; or

The material so passed into the atmosphere.

"Evaporative emission" means:

The act of releasing hydrocarbons into the atmosphere by means of evaporation from a motor vehicle; or

The material so passed into the atmosphere.

"Federal Clean Air Act" means 42 U.S.C. Section 7401, et seq., as amended.

"Highway" means any road or way publicly maintained and open for use by the public for vehicular traffic.

"Hydrocarbons" means any compound containing carbon and hydrogen.

"Inspection term" means the period of time a certificate of emission inspection shall be considered valid. The specific period of an inspection term shall be established by the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article; provided, however, an inspection term shall be no less than 12 months.

"Mechanic inspector" means a person approved and issued a license by the department to perform the emission inspections required by this article.

"Model year" means the manufacturer's annual production period, as determined by the director, provided that, if the manufacturer has no annual production period, the term "model year" shall mean the calendar year. The model year shall be determined by the vehicle identification number appearing on the vehicle.

"Motor vehicle" means any contrivance propelled by power other than muscular power, used for transportation of persons or property on highways, and not operated exclusively upon tracks.

"National Ambient Air Quality Standard" or "NAAQS" means those allowable ambient air concentrations for pollutants, including ozone and carbon monoxide, specified by the USEPA pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 7401, et seq., as amended.

"Nitrogen oxides" means any of the various compounds which contain only nitrogen and oxygen.

"Nonattainment area" means a geographic area designated by the USEPA in the Code of Federal Regulations as an area which has not attained or maintained the NAAQS for ozone or carbon monoxide or both in accordance with the federal Clean Air Act, as amended.

"Owner" means the registered owner or the individual presenting the responsible motor vehicle for the emission inspection required under this article.

"Person" means any natural person or individual, corporation, partnership, association, state or federal government, political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the state or federal government or any other entity.

"Responsible motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle defined by the USEPA and published in the Code of Federal Regulations as a light duty vehicle or light duty truck, excluding any motor vehicle exempted from this article by the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article; provided, however, that no such exemption shall be granted to a motor vehicle unless such exemption is in accordance with the federal Clean Air Act, as amended.

"USEPA" means the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 2.)

12-9-44. Uniformity and scope of application of article.

This article shall operate uniformly throughout the state. The provisions and requirements of this article shall apply in each county or any portion of a county which has been designated by the USEPA in the Code of Federal Regulations as a county or area included within a nonattainment area and which the board designates, through regulation, as a county or area where the excess levels of ozone or carbon monoxide or both are directly related to emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, or carbon monoxide from responsible motor vehicles registered in such county or area. This article shall continue to apply in each such county or portion of a county so designated until the USEPA removes such county or area from the Code of Federal Regulations as a nonattainment area and approves an air quality implementation plan which allows the state to maintain the NAAQS in such county without a vehicle inspection program.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 3.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "part" in the first sentence.

12-9-45. Certificate of emission inspection.

In each county to which this article applies, there is required a valid certificate of emission inspection issued by an emission inspection station certified under this article for each responsible motor vehicle registered pursuant to or subject to the requirements of Chapter 2 of Title 40 in such county. A valid certificate of emission inspection is also required for each responsible motor vehicle owned by any federal agency, state agency, municipality, or other political subdivision registered pursuant to Code Section 40-2-34 or 40-2-35, whichever is applicable, and assigned for use to any federal agency, state agency, municipality, or other political subdivision located in such county and for each responsible motor vehicle which is operated 60 days or more in any calendar year on a federal installation located in whole or in part in any such county.

A certificate of emission inspection shall be valid for one inspection term. The owner of each responsible motor vehicle subject to subsection (a) of this Code section is required to obtain a new certificate of emission inspection on or before the date the current certificate of emission inspection expires or prior to the vehicle registration date in the year following the expiration of the certificate, as determined by the board.

Such certificate of emission inspection must certify that:

An inspection of exhaust emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide and evaporative emissions of hydrocarbons, as required by Code Section 12-9-48, has been performed;

The responsible motor vehicle complies, as required by Code Section 12-9-48, with applicable emission standards or emission limitations for hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide specified for such vehicle by the board pursuant to Code Section 12-9-46;

An inspection, as required by Code Section 12-9-48, of emission control equipment which was required to be installed on such motor vehicle when new by the federal Clean Air Act and is required to be inspected by the board in the regulations promulgated pursuant to this article has been performed and that such equipment is present and has been maintained as required by Code Section 12-9-48; and

An inspection, as required by Code Section 12-9-48, of on-board diagnostic equipment which was required to be installed on such motor vehicle when new by the federal Clean Air Act and is required to be inspected by the board in the regulations promulgated pursuant to this article has been performed, as required by Code Section 12-9-48.

In any county or area not designated by the USEPA as a nonattainment area as of November 1, 1990, which is subsequently designated by the board as a nonattainment area subject to this article, the department shall have 12 months from the date such designation occurs to establish a program for emission inspection of responsible motor vehicles in such county or area; provided, however, that for purposes of this article, the earliest date such county or area shall be considered as having been designated as a nonattainment area shall be July 1, 1992. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, in such counties or areas a certificate of emission inspection shall not be required during this initial 12 month period. Following such initial 12 month period, owners of responsible motor vehicles in such counties or areas shall obtain a valid certificate of emission inspection no later than the date established by the board.

In each county or area subject to this article on July 1, 1992, owners of responsible motor vehicles shall obtain a valid certificate of emission inspection issued pursuant to this article not later than June 30, 1993.

The requirements of paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection (c) of this Code section shall remain in effect in each county or area either during such time as such county or any part of the county continues to be designated by the USEPA pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act as a nonattainment area or during such time as the emission program for each such county is contained in the state's air quality maintenance plan.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Code section, the requirements of this article shall not apply to vehicles registered as specified in subsection (a) of this Code section where the owner of such vehicle certifies, under oath and subject to the monetary penalty provided in Code Section 16-10-71 upon conviction for false swearing therein, which certification may be made either by mail and accompanied by a photocopy of the person's military identification card or in person, that:

Such vehicle is so registered by a Georgia resident on active duty in the armed services of the United States then residing outside the State of Georgia;

At the time the provisions of this article are being or are sought to be enforced with respect to such vehicle, the owner's domicile or, if such vehicle is primarily used in connection with some established business enterprise, such established business enterprise is not located in any county wherein any responsible motor vehicle is subject to the requirements of this article; or

Such vehicle is or will be, during the inspection term for which the provisions of this article are being or are sought to be enforced with respect to such motor vehicle, permanently assigned or let for use to a person not domiciled or an established business enterprise not located in any county wherein any responsible motor vehicle is subject to the requirements of this article.

The director shall provide the forms for any such certification.

Vehicles that are driven less than 5,000 miles per year and are ten years old or older will be exempted from testing, provided that the owner of such vehicle is 65 years old or older.

Antique and collector cars and trucks 25 years old or older will be exempted from testing.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, the undesignated language following subsection (i) was moved to its original location to appear as the undesignated language following paragraph (g)(3).

U.S. Code.

- The federal Clean Air Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 42 U.S.C.

§

7401 et seq.

12-9-46. Powers and duties of board; designation of commissioner or director as board's agent; power and duties of director.

The board shall have the following powers and duties under this article:

To adopt criteria to establish whether emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide from responsible motor vehicles in each county or area within a nonattainment area are directly related to excess levels of ozone or carbon monoxide or both in such county or area; provided, however, that such criteria shall in no event be more stringent than the criteria established by the USEPA pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act;

To designate each county or area within a nonattainment area which meets the criteria established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection;

To prescribe by rule or regulation emission standards or emission limitations limiting the amounts of allowable exhaust emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide and evaporative emissions of hydrocarbons from responsible motor vehicles as defined in this article. Such standards may specify the amount of allowable emissions by part per million, percentage of total volume or weight of emissions, or such other method as the board selects. In no event shall the emission limitations be stricter than those required by the USEPA pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act, as amended, for the particular vehicle to which such limitations apply. Such emission limitations and emission standards may distinguish between model years, engine types and sizes, trucks and passenger vehicles, or weights of vehicles and may be applicable to groups of vehicles classed according to any such distinctions. Such emission limitations shall be technically feasible. The board may provide by rule or regulation for the method of application of such standards to vehicles with engines of a model year different from the vehicle model year;

To prescribe by rule or regulation equipment standards, requirements, or specifications for any inspection equipment used to test, measure, inspect for, or determine compliance by a responsible motor vehicle or any responsible motor vehicle equipment with the standards, limitations, or other requirements established by or under the authority of this article;

To prescribe by rule or regulation standards and qualifications for mechanic inspectors licensed to operate inspection equipment to inspect responsible motor vehicles or responsible motor vehicle equipment for compliance with standards, limitations, or other requirements established by or pursuant to this article;

To prescribe by rule or regulation operating techniques, specifications, procedures, requirements for records maintenance, criteria, and other requirements applicable to emission inspection stations authorized to inspect responsible motor vehicles or responsible motor vehicle equipment for compliance with the standards, limitations, or other requirements established by or pursuant to this article;

To prescribe by rule or regulation requirements for record keeping and reporting, including, but not limited to, monitoring, surveys, inventories, inspections, reinspections, the results thereof, certification and licensing of mechanic inspectors, certification of emission inspection stations, and certificates of emission inspection issued;

To prescribe by rule or regulation for the exemption of certain motor vehicles or model years from the requirements of this article; provided, however, that no exemption shall be granted to a motor vehicle unless such exemption is in accordance with the federal Clean Air Act, as amended;

To prescribe by rule or regulation fees to be charged by emission inspection stations for the performance of emission inspections; provided, however, that such fee shall be no less than $10.00 and no more than $25.00 per inspection and shall be based on the cost of performing such inspection in an adequate and proper manner including, without limitation, the cost of equipment, testing, labor, training, record keeping, reporting, and other overhead expenses;

To prescribe by rule or regulation for an inspection term for required emission inspections of responsible motor vehicles. Such term shall either be annual or biennial as required to meet minimum requirements of the federal Clean Air Act and regulations of the USEPA promulgated pursuant to such act;

To prescribe by rule or regulation an administrative fee to be collected by the director from each emission inspection station in a manner determined by the board by rule or regulation to cover the direct and indirect cost of:

Required and adequate oversight to confirm that inspections are being done in a proper and adequate manner, including, without limitation, the operation and maintenance of a data system and network for emission inspection data and related information; the performance of audits and quality control and quality assurance for certified emission inspection stations and licensed inspectors; the dissemination of information to individuals, corporations, governmental agencies, and any other entity regarding emission inspection requirements and related information; and the issuance of waivers, exemptions, and extensions of the emission inspection requirement;

Activities of the director within designated nonattainment areas that are necessary to achieve compliance with this article and the federal Clean Air Act including, without limitation, ambient monitoring, attainment plan development, maintenance plan development, emission inventories, data analysis, and coordination and consultation with other governmental planning organizations; and

Any other requirements that the board determines are appropriate to implement, enforce, and ensure compliance with the requirements of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article; provided, however, that $1.00 of each such administrative fee shall be remitted to the county for each responsible motor vehicle that is registered in that county; and

To advise, consult, cooperate, and contract with other state agencies including, but not limited to, the Department of Public Safety, any political subdivision of the state, any designated organizations of elected officials within the state, or any other person as necessary to implement and adequately enforce and ensure compliance with any requirement created, provided, prescribed, or established by the board pursuant to this article.

With respect to the powers vested in the board pursuant to this Code section, the board may designate the commissioner or the director as its agent in exercising the powers so vested.

The director shall have the following powers and duties:

To exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this article and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated under this article;

To issue certificates and licenses and to deny, suspend, or revoke certificates and licenses;

To issue all orders and processes as may be necessary to enforce compliance with provisions of this article and all rules and regulations promulgated under this article, and to seek collection of all penalties imposed pursuant to this article;

To conduct such public hearings as are deemed necessary for the proper administration of this article;

To make investigations, analyses, and inspections to determine and ensure compliance with this article, rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article, and any orders which the director may issue;

To institute and prosecute such administrative and court actions as may be necessary to enforce compliance with any provisions of this article and any rules and regulations promulgated under this article;

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this article; and

To encourage voluntary cooperation by persons and affected groups to achieve the purposes of this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1524, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 5, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 71, § 1/SB 198.)

U.S. Code.

- The federal Clean Air Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 42 U.S.C.

§

7401 et seq.

12-9-47. Further powers and duties of board; designation of department personnel as board's agents.

The board shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties under this article:

To prescribe by rule or regulation standards, requirements, or procedures to ensure the uniform operation of official emission inspection stations in a sufficient number, at such locations, and in a manner satisfactory to the board and in conformance with all standards, requirements, and specifications prescribed for such inspection stations, procedures, personnel, and equipment by the board pursuant to this article;

To prescribe by rule or regulation procedures for licensing mechanic inspectors under this article;

To prescribe by rule or regulation procedures for certification of authorized emission inspection stations which shall be certified by the department to inspect responsible motor vehicle emissions, responsible motor vehicle emission control equipment, and on-board diagnostic equipment for compliance with the requirements of this article;

To prescribe by rule or regulation forms, applications, certificates, licenses, or other documentation which may be required by the department to administer and implement this article;

To prescribe by rule or regulation procedures, standards, and methods for inspecting emission inspection stations or other establishments to enforce and ensure compliance with the requirements of this article;

To prescribe by rule or regulation procedures or methods of scheduling responsible motor vehicles for emission inspection during any inspection term; and

To prescribe by rule or regulation procedures for identifying, through the use of remote sensing technology or other means, vehicles which are producing excessive exhaust emissions at times other than their regularly scheduled inspection. The board may require that any such vehicle undergo an official emission inspection as prescribed by subsection (a) of Code Section 12-9-48, whether or not such vehicle is covered by a valid certificate of emission inspection. The board may prescribe that the owner of any such vehicle which fails to pass such inspection perform repairs and pass a reinspection in the same manner as provided by subsection (d) of Code Section 12-9-48.

With respect to the powers vested in the board pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the board may designate personnel of the department as the board's agents in exercising the powers so vested.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 6.)

12-9-48. Requirement of certificate of emission inspection; standards for issuance; inspectors, equipment, and procedures; notice of violation of emission standards; reinspection after repairs; time extension; inspection sticker; new vehicles; replacement stickers.

Each responsible motor vehicle subject to any requirement under Code Section 12-9-45 must receive a certificate of emission inspection once during any inspection term from an emission inspection station holding a valid certificate of authorization from the department. A certificate of emission inspection shall be issued for such a responsible motor vehicle if, upon inspection by a licensed mechanic inspector, the mechanic inspector determines, consistent with the terms of Code Section 12-9-45, with respect to such responsible motor vehicle:

That any emission control equipment required on such responsible motor vehicle when new by the federal Clean Air Act and required to be inspected by the regulations of the board promulgated pursuant to this article has been inspected and the mechanic inspector has determined that such equipment has not been rendered unserviceable by removal, alteration, lack of maintenance, or other interference with its operation unless such equipment was replaced with equivalent equipment which has been certified by the USEPA;

That an inspection and testing of the exhaust emissions of hydrocarbons, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide from such responsible motor vehicle have been performed;

That an inspection and testing of evaporative emissions of hydrocarbons from such responsible motor vehicle have been performed;

That the exhaust emissions and evaporative emissions from the responsible motor vehicle do not exceed any applicable emission standard or emission limitation for allowable emissions of hydrocarbon, nitrogen oxides, or carbon monoxide prescribed by the board pursuant to this article; and

That any on-board diagnostic equipment required on such responsible motor vehicle when new by the federal Clean Air Act and required to be inspected pursuant to the regulations promulgated by the board has been inspected and the mechanic inspector has determined that such equipment meets the inspection criteria prescribed by the board.

Compliance with any applicable emission standards, emission limitations, standards for emission control equipment, or standards for on-board diagnostic equipment shall be determined by mechanic inspectors meeting qualifications; using methods, techniques, and equipment; under conditions; and following inspection procedures prescribed by the board pursuant to this article.

If the inspection discloses any violation of any applicable emission standard, emission limitation, standard of emission control equipment, or standard for on-board diagnostic equipment, then the owner shall be notified, in writing, of the air pollutant which exceeds the allowable emissions and the degree of excess or the specific emission control equipment or on-board diagnostic equipment which is in violation of the standard.

The owner shall have necessary maintenance and repairs performed on any responsible motor vehicle violating any applicable emission standard, emission limitation, standard for emission control equipment, or standard for on-board diagnostic equipment and return the responsible motor vehicle for reinspection at an emission inspection station within 30 days of the initial inspection. Such reinspection shall be at no charge to the owner. If, upon reinspection, such motor vehicle fails to meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section, no certificate of emission inspection shall be issued unless the owner proves, by means of repair facility receipts or other written documents, that:

He or she has replaced any emission control equipment, exhaust system equipment, or on-board diagnostic equipment or part thereof which has been removed, physically damaged, or otherwise rendered inoperable;

He or she has spent at least $450.00 or such amount as the board establishes, consistent with the federal Clean Air Act, in the repair and maintenance of the responsible motor vehicle exhaust and evaporative, as applicable, emission control systems, on-board diagnostic equipment, or related equipment not covered by warranty since the initial inspection in the current inspection term; provided, however, that the $450.00 repair waiver authorized in this paragraph shall be increased annually by the percentage, if any, by which the Consumer Price Index for the most recent calendar year ending before the beginning of such year exceeds the Consumer Price Index for the calendar year 1989. For purposes of this paragraph, the Consumer Price Index is the average of the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, as of the close of the 12 month period ending the last day of August of each calendar year, and the revision of the Consumer Price Index which is most consistent with the Consumer Price Index for 1989 shall be used; and

Such repairs and maintenance have produced a decrease in exhaust and evaporative emissions, as applicable, since the initial inspection.

A time extension, not to exceed the period of the inspection frequency, may be granted to obtain needed repairs on a vehicle in the case of economic hardship when waiver requirements contained in subsection (d) of this Code section have not been met. After having received a time extension under this subsection, a vehicle must fully pass the applicable test standards before becoming eligible for another time extension.

The board may require each responsible motor vehicle to display an emission inspection sticker issued in conjunction with a certificate of emission inspection on the motor vehicle once it has been approved as meeting the requirements of this article. Any emission inspection sticker shall bear such information as shall be required by the director. The mechanic inspector shall remove from the vehicle being inspected any old emission inspection sticker when a new emission inspection sticker is issued.

All certificates of emission inspection shall be issued for the inspection term.

A new responsible motor vehicle otherwise required under Code Section 12-9-45 to have an inspection or certificate of inspection shall not be required to have either that inspection or certificate at the time of the initial retail sale or delivery of that vehicle, but the required emission inspection and certificate of inspection shall be obtained prior to the vehicle registration date in the calendar year two years after the vehicle's model year or at such other time as the board may establish by rule or regulation.

The board may establish methods by which the owner of a responsible motor vehicle who has lost the certificate of emission inspection required in any inspection term may have a duplicate certificate of emission inspection issued. These methods may include, but are not limited to, the following:

Any approved emission inspection station may issue said duplicate certification of emission inspection upon the owner's demonstrating to the mechanic inspector that the responsible motor vehicle has a current and valid inspection sticker affixed to its window;

The director shall issue said duplicate certification of emission inspection upon the owner's demonstrating to the director that said vehicle had been inspected previously and bears a current and valid inspection sticker; or

In the event a windshield bearing a valid emission inspection sticker is replaced, a new emission inspection sticker may be issued for such vehicle within 30 days after the replacement of the windshield without the necessity of reinspection if the owner of the vehicle executes an affidavit in a form furnished by the director stating that the windshield of his or her vehicle has been replaced and giving such other information as the director may require and pays to the inspection station a fee in an amount equal to the actual administrative cost of issuing such a sticker which shall be no less than the cost of the sticker plus the cost of computer access. The vehicle may be operated on the highways without an emission inspection sticker for 30 days after the replacement of the windshield if proof of the date of such replacement is carried in the vehicle.

In all cases, the new emission inspection sticker or duplicate certificate of emission inspection shall be valid only for the remainder of the period for which the replaced emission inspection sticker or certificate of emission inspection was to be valid.

The inspection provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not require any alteration of any portion of the engine or equipping of the engine with any device for the sole purpose of facilitating the conduct of such test during the testing periods for 1997 and 1998.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 71, § 2/SB 198.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "have" was substituted for "has" near the end of paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3).

U.S. Code.

- The federal Clean Air Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 42 U.S.C.

§

7401 et seq.